South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3305.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  (A) The source of revenue appropriated in subsection (B) is nonrecurring revenue generated from the residual balance of nonrecurring funds from the General Appropriations Act for Fiscal Year 2026-2027. This revenue is deemed to have occurred and is available for use in Fiscal Year 2026-27 following the Comptroller General's close of the state's books on Fiscal Year 2025-26. (B) The appropriations in this subsection are listed in priority order. Item (1) must be funded first and each remaining item must be fully funded before any funds are allocated to the next item.  Provided, however, that any individual item may be partially funded in the order in which it appears to the extent that revenues are available. The State Treasurer shall disburse the following appropriations by September 30, 2026, for the purposes stated. (1) H630 Department of Education (a) Greenwood School District 50 - CTE Funding  $  887,900; (b) Lexington/Richland County - Apprenticeship Pipeline Partnership - Lex-Rich School District 5           $  250,000; (c) Spartanburg County - Daniel Morgan Technology Center $  5,000,000; (2) H090 The Citadel Cadet Parking Lot Safety and Access  $  100,000; (3) H790 Department of Archives and History (a) Cherokee County Historic Preservation $  750,000; (b) Greenville County - McCullough House Renovation $  500,000; (c) Newberry County - Rosenwald School - Senior Care & Renovation $  20,000; (d) Old Exchange Building   $  250,000; (e) Town of Eastover - Eastover Historic Revitalization & Community Development Initiative       $  500,000; (4) H870 State Library Town of Santee - Santee Library  $  250,000; (5) H910 Arts Commission (a) Arts Center of Coastal Carolina Renovations $  1,000,000; (b) Columbia Museum of Art - Capital Request for Accreditation Compliance $  500,000; (6) J060 Department of Public Health (a) Charleston County - EMS Headquarters $  1,000,000; (b) Lancaster County- Mobile Health & Recovery Unit $  150,000; (c) Marion County - Health Department  $  285,950; (d) Oconee County - Oconee Memorial Hospital $  1,000,000; (7) J080 Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities (a) Aiken-Barnwell Mental Health - Property Acquisition  $  100,000; (b) City of Charleston - Homeless Initiative $  100,000; (c) Richland County - Mental Health Assistance at Alvin S. Glenn   $  120,000; (8) L060 Department on Aging City of Bishopville - Vehicles for Senior Meal Deliveries  $  33,000; (9) P160 Department of Agriculture (a) City of York - Project Green Landing $  2,000,000; (b) Department of Agriculture - Soybean Board Federal Checkoff Funds Interest $  227,468; (10) P280 Department of Parks, Recreation and Tourism (a) Anderson County - Chris Taylor Park - Walking Track, Bridge, & Boardwalk Reconstruction  $  997,000; (b) Anderson County - McFall's Landing Renovations   $  1,080,000; (c) Berkeley County - Live Oak Complex $  3,500,000; (d) City of Charleston - IAAM Marketing Support Funding  $  500,000; (e) City of Charleston - Infrastructure and Community Projects $  650,000; (f) City of Clemson - Abernathy Park Enhancement Project  $  2,000,000; (g) City of Conway - Historic Railroad Trestle Conversion to ADA Accessible Pedestrian extension of Riverwalk $  1,500,000; (h) City of Conway - Restoration of the Century Theatre   $  1,200,000; (i) City of Dillon - Recreation Upgrades $  250,000; (j) City of Hartsville - The Center Theater Renovation   $  250,000; (k) City of Isle of Palms - Beach Access Improvement  $  250,000; (l) City of Isle of Palms Public Greenspace at Isle of Palms Marina  $  150,000; (m) City of Mullins - Gapway Park Baseball Concession   $  275,000; (n) City of Orangeburg - Recreation Facility HVAC Upgrade $  250,000; (o) City of Orangeburg - Recreation Opportunities $  50,000; (p) City of Sumter - Heritage Park $  500,000; (q) City of Sumter - Millcreek Park $  400,000; (r) City of Sumter - Swan Lake & Park Enhancements   $  500,000; (s) City of Westminster - Westminster Recreational Fields $  2,000,000; (t) Edisto Island Community Recreation Area - Edisto Island Youth Recreation  $  1,000,000; (u) Georgetown County - Murrells Inlet Landing Ramp Replacement   $  1,500,000; (v) Georgetown County - Wacca Wach Boat Landing Parking Area Resurfacing & ADA Access $  130,000; (w) Greenville Arena Special Purpose District - Renovations $  5,000,000; (x) Horry County - Michael Morris Graham Rec Center $  500,000; (y) Marion County - Britton's Neck Community Park $  462,000; (z) Marion County - Community Center  $  1,500,000; (aa) Richland County - Recreation Commission - Trenholm Park Renovation Project                              $1,250,000; (bb) Rock Hill City - Armory Park Restrooms $  100,000; (cc) Town of Barnwell - Barnwell ADA Restroom and Safety Upgrades Lake Brown $  250,000; (dd) Town of Chapin - Park Development   $  37,500; (ee) Town of Cowpens - Downtown Revitalization $  500,000; (ff) Town of McBee - Recreation Upgrade  $  300,000; (gg) Town of Prosperity - McNeary Street Beautification  $  43,000; (hh) Town of Ware Shoals - Katherine Hall Parking Lot Rehabilitation $  75,000; (ii) Palmetto Trail                           $300,000 (jj) City of Loris - Loris Youth Club           $200,000 (11) P320 Department of Commerce (a) City of Columbia - Congaree Riverfront District   $  5,000,000; (b) Williamsburg County - Phase 2 Retrofitting Multi-Purpose Industrial Building  $  500,000; (12) P500 Department of Environmental Services (a) Abbeville County - Calhoun Falls Water Meter Replacements $  150,000; (b) Berkeley County - Saint Stephen Wastewater Infrastructure $  1,000,000; (c) Calhoun County - Sanitary Sewer Improvements  $  563,000; (d) City of Aiken - Waterline Infrastructure Replacement  $  1,000,000; (e) City of Belton - Water System Improvements $  500,000; (f) City of Cayce Avenues Drainage Project $  1,000,000; (g) City of Charleston - Brockman Drive Drainage Improvement  $  100,000; (h) City of Columbia - The Station at Congaree Point $  3,750,000; (i) City of Darlington - Water, Sewer and Storm Water Operations Facility $  500,000; (j) City of Isle of Palms - Stormwater and Drainage Infrastructure $  1,000,000; (k) City of Travelers Rest - Storm Water Infrastructure  $  500,000; (l)    Greenville County - Redevelopment Authority - Infrastructure Development and Engineering $  150,000; (m) Greenville Water - Greenville Water Watershed Protection and Restoration Program $  500,000; (n) Laurens County Water & Sewer - Gray Court Sewer Project $  4,000,000; (o) Town of Blacksburg - Hwy 5 Water Line Extension $  700,000; (p) Town of Blacksburg - Jumping Branch Water Line Extension $  600,000; (q) Town of Clover - Water System Infrastructure Rehabilitation  $  1,500,000; (r) Town of Edisto Beach - Drainage Improvements   $  300,000; (s) Town of Greeleyville - Water Meters Improvement Project  $  264,420; (t) Town of James Island - Bay Front Drainage Improvements  $  500,000; (u) Town of Lamar - Wastewater Treatment Plant Sewer System Infrastructure Upgrades $  500,000; (v) Town of Lane - Water Meter Project  $  285,000; (w) Town of Norway - Water/Wastewater   $  1,200,000; (x) Town of Pageland - Elevated Water Tower $  1,000,000; (y) Town of Whitmire - Water Main Replacement  $  500,000; (13) K050 Department of Public Safety (a) Chester County - Land Purchase for Detention/Law Enforcement $  1,500,000; (b) City & County of Newberry - Joint Public Safety Complex $  787,000; (c) City of Campobello - New City Complex  $  700,000; (d) City of Florence - Florence Police Capital Improvements $  538,500; (e) City of Greenville - Real Time Crime Center (RTCC)  $  1,005,000; (f) City of Johnsonville - Police Vehicles $  65,000; (g) City of Manning - Town Improvements $  500,000; (h) Fairfield County - Sheriff's Office K-9 Unit  $  100,000; (i) Florence County Sheriff's Office - FCSO Drug Lab Equipment Update   $  50,000; (j) Newberry County - Sheriff's Department Records Keeping Technology Upgrade $ 500,000; (k) Oconee County - Sheriff's Department Equipment $  240,000; (l) Pickens County - Sheriff's Office Equipment $  239,595; (m) Saluda County Detention Center $  500,000; (n) Town of Andrews - Andrews Public Safety Complex   $  1,000,000; (o) Town of Pamplico - 10-Year Fleet Dashboard Camera For Patrol Fleet  $  128,000; (p) Town of Pamplico - Safety Initiative  $  12,000; (q) Town of Summerville - Public Safety Campus  $  1,200,000; (r) Town of Timmonsville - Radio System Upgrades for Police Department $  31,716; (s) Williamsburg County - Public Safety Improvements $  205,000; (t) York County - Renovate Moss Justice Detention Center   $  4,000,000; (14) R060 Office of Regulatory Staff Anderson County - Utility Relocation $  300,000; (15) R360 Department of Labor, Licensing and Regulation (a) Aiken County - Fire Tanker & Ambulance $  725,000; (b) Antioch Volunteer Fire Department - Tanker Fire Truck  $  442,257; (c) Berkeley County - Moncks Corner RFD PEBA Settlement  $  73,329; (d) Boiling Springs Fire District - Replacement of Self-Contained Breathing Apparatus (SCBA)             $  300,000; (e) Boiling Springs Fire District - Self-Contained Breathing Apparatus Air Compressor and Fill System  $  80,962; (f) Boiling Springs Fire District - Turnout Gear and SCBA Decontamination Washer $  47,582; (g) City of Columbia - Air Drone First Responder Expansion $  700,000; (h) City of Florence - Florence Fire Department Fire Engine $  1,000,000; (i) City of Greenwood Fire Department   $  800,000; (j) City of Greer - City Projects/Fire & Police Training Facility $  2,000,000; (k) City of Hartsville - Hartsville Fire Department Radios $  250,000; (l) City of Travelers Rest - Fire Airpacks $  270,962; (m) Colleton County - SCBA Equipment $  1,500,000; (n) Dorchester County Fire Rescue  $  2,000,000; (o) Fountain Inn - Canebrake Fire Department Water Tanker $  502,000; (p) Lake Cunningham Fire District (Greenville) Critical Fire Station $  1,200,000; (q) Lincolnville Volunteer Fire Department Equipment $  1,000,000; (r) Lugoff Fire District of Kershaw County - Training Facility  $  1,000,000; (s) Oakdale Volunteer Fire Department Replacement Fires Station   $  250,000; (t) Palmetto Rural Fire Department - Equipment $  370,800; (u) Richland County - Columbia/RC Fire Stations   $  500,000; (v) River Falls Fire Department - Upgrade Fire Equipment $  135,000; (w) Tigerville Fire Department - Upgrade Rescue Equipment $  34,000; (x) Town of Arcadia Lakes - Extra Duty Deputies  $  94,900; (y) Town of Cameron - Fire Department SCBA's $  96,000; (z) Union County - Buffalo Volunteer Fire District $  30,000; (aa) Union County - Jonesville Fire Station 500 Parking Lot $  36,000; (bb) Wade Hampton Fire & Sewer District - Replacement of  Structural Firefighting Turnout Gear $  193,041; (cc) Wade Hampton Fire & Sewer District - Self-Contained Breathing Apparatus (SCBA) Air Cylinders  $  120,416; (16) U120 Department of Transportation (a) Anderson County - EVP Systems Program $  400,000; (b) CARTA - Bus Stop Amenities $  100,000; (c) Charleston County Public Works - Fleming Rd. Sidewalk & Wappoo Rd. MUP $  150,000; (d) Chester City - Parking Lot and Utility Work Downtown  $  100,000; (e) City of North Augusta - West Martintown Road/Knobcone Avenue Intersection Improvement  $  1,000,000; (f) Marine Transportation System for Beaufort and Jasper Counties  $  3,000,000; (g) Regional Rural Transportation Transit - Bamberg, Barnwell, Allendale Counties  $  500,000; (h) Town of Bluffton - Boundary Street Improvements  $  1,000,000; (i) Town of Clover - Pedestrian Infrastructure/Sidewalk Repairs   $  2,000,000; (j) Town of Lexington - Hope Ferry Road at Sunset Blvd (US-378) Intersection Improvements $  2,000,000; (k) Traffic Mitigation in Easley - Pickens County CTC  $  2,500,000; (l) Williamsburg County - Soccee Bridge Restoration $  300,000; (16.1) The funds appropriated in item (16)(f) to assist with the implementation of a Marine Transportation System for Beaufort and Jasper Counties shall be used to provide public investment necessary to attract and leverage private sector participation, including ferry operators, water taxi services, and hospitality businesses as recommended in the feasibility study prepared by Stantec Consulting Services for the Southern Carolina Regional Economic Development Alliance which established of the technical feasibility and economic justification of a viable marine transport system. The Department of Transportation shall work with Beaufort and Jasper Counties, local chambers of commerce, economic development organizations, the South Carolina Intracoastal Transportation Management Association, and other stakeholders to identify and actively engage private sector improvements at terminal locations identified in the Stantec study, vessel acquisition assistance, charging infrastructure, permitting and environmental coordination, and related capital investments that reduce barriers to private participation. The Department shall prioritize expenditures that maximize private sector leverage and shall not duplicate planning work already completed. The Department shall submit a report to the Chairman of the Senate Finance Committee and the Chairman of the House Ways and Means Committee no later than January 31, 2027, describing private sector engagement efforts, commitments obtained, funds expended, and a projected timeline for system operations to commence. (17) U300 Division of Aeronautics Greenville Downtown Airport - Corporate and Individual Hangar Development Areas $  4,000,000; (18) D300 Office of Resilience (a) City of Columbia - Neighborhood Revitalization & Weatherization Program $  1,000,000 (b) Georgetown County - Murrells Inlet Dredging  $  2,000,000; (c) Orangeburg County - Storm Shelter & Alternate Emergency Generators $  750,000; (d) Shutes Folly Castle Pinckney Resiliency $  1,250,000; (19) D500 Department of Administration (a) Allendale County - Allendale County Government Building AC and Roofing $  200,000; (b) Anderson County - CTC Matching Funds  $  1,000,000; (c) Anderson County - Pelzer Lower Mill Mitigation Infrastructure Planning   $  240,000; (d) Barnwell County - Armory Renovations $  500,000; (e) Berkeley County - Coroner's Office Morgue Addition  $  630,000; (f) City of Orangeburg - Storm Cleanup  $  250,000; (g) City of Walhalla - Walhalla Core Function Equipment $  2,000,000; (h) Town of Cameron - Abandoned Home/Lot Cleanup $  100,000; (i) Town of Honea Path - City Hall Renovations $  500,000; (j) Town of Iva - Community Facilities Repair and Renovation $  150,000; (k) Town of Nichols - Community Equipment $  349,000; (l) Town of St. Stephens - Paving for Multi-Purpose Building   $  100,000; (m) Union County - New County Animal Shelter and Recycling Center   $  1,500,000; (20) H630 Department of Education (a) City of Marion - Children's Education Outreach Partnership $80,000; (b) SME Prime - Manufacturing Partnership with Mauldin High School  $300,000; (c) Virtual Reality STEM Instruction   $1,000,000; (d) Meyer Center - Relocation Costs $1,830,000; (e) FIRST SC - Robotics Education and STEM  $150,000; (f) City of Charleston - Pink House Building Improvements  $135,000; (g) Rock Hill School District - Applied Technology Center   $610,000; (h) Jasper County School District - Real Champions, Inc   $518,500; (i) Pickens County School District - Gateway to Innovation  $500,000; (j) City of Greenville - Pleasant Valley Connections  $305,000; (k) Spartanburg School District Two - Chesnee High School Crosswalk  $457,500; (l) United Way of the Midlands - Young Men United $355,000; (m) Chesterfield County School District - ADA Compliance $915,000; (n) Special Olympics of South Carolina  $300,000; (21) H030 Commission on Higher Education Riley Institute at Furman - South Carolina Afterschool Leaders Empowered   $300,000; (22) H120 Clemson University Due West Robotics - Palmetto Innovation and Technology Center    $300,000; (23) H150 University of Charleston South Carolina African American Tourism Council    $100,000; (24) H270 University of South Carolina - Columbia (a) Congaree Riverfront District Project  $3,045,000; (b) Warfighters Musculoskeletal Strength and Injury Prevention Program    $500,000; (25) H360 University of South Carolina - Beaufort (a) AI Innovation Institute $3,050,000; (b) Alliance for Lowcountry Research Education and Research $305,000; (26) H590 State Board for Technical and Comprehensive Education Williamsburg Technical College - Commercial Driver's License Training Pad $300,000; (27) H790 Department of Archives and History (a) South Carolina American Revolution Sestercentennial Commission $15,000; (b) City of Greenville - Preservation of Historical Property $579,500; (c) Pickens County - Hagood Mill Historic Site  $1,275,000; (d) Dorchester Heritage Center - Inland Lowcountry History and Event Facility  $300,000; (e) Town of Mount Pleasant - 1904 Long Point Schoolhouse $250,000; (f) Richland County - Randolph Cemetery $50,000; (28) H910 Arts Commission City of Rock Hill - Marlie Center $830,000; (29) H950 State Museum Commission South Carolina State Firefighters' Association-Fire Heritage Center and Museum   $500,000; (30) J060 Department of Public Health (a) Town of Ridgeland - Operation Patriots FOB Wellness and Resource Center $1,525,000; (b) Health Services District of Kershaw County - Health and Community Center $610,000; (c) City of Aiken - Aiken's Center of Hope $2,000,000; (d) Anderson County - Medical Emergency Shelter $891,455; (e) Edgefield County EMS Headquarter Building   $3,000,000; (31) H730 Department of Vocational Rehabilitation Trinity Educational Community Center Project TECH   $300,000; (32) J020 Department of Health and Human Services (a) Tender Hearts Maternity Home - New Maternity Home $150,000; (b) City of Aiken - Umoja Village Community Projects $300,000; (c) PRISMA Health - Sickle Cell Disease Lifespan Center $890,000; (d) Beaufort County - Pregnancy Center of the Lowcountry  $50,000; (e) Richland County - Wiley Kennedy Foundation Thriving Communities   $150,000; (f) New Morning - Family Planning Initiative $610,000; (33) J080 Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities (a) FAVOR Upstate - Addiction Recovery Services   $610,000; (b) Our Place of Hope - Mental Illness Support Programs  $175,000; (c) Brain Injury Association of South Carolina - Outreach and Education $500,000; (d) Community Medicine Foundation - Sickle Cell $557,500; (34) L040 Department of Social Services (a) City of Hardeeville - Bluffton Self-Help Fresh Food Program  $50,000; (b) Colleton County - Johnsville Community Center  $300,000; (35) L060 Department on Aging Williamsburg County - Vital Aging Center ADA Compliance   $100,000; (36) L320 Housing Finance and Development Authority (a) City of Georgetown - Housing Redevelopment Authority $915,000; (b) City of Greenville - Neighborhood Infrastructure  $976,000; (c) City of Columbia - Fairwold and College Place Housing  $305,000; (d) City of Columbia - Neighborhood Revitalization  $1,440,000; (e) City of Lancaster - Ellen Dean Building Historic Renovation  $991,000; (f) City of Hartsville - Residential Housing Repair $305,000; (37) P160 Department of Agriculture (a) Town of Blythewood - Farmers Market Pavillion  $396,500; (b) Laurens County - Agricultural Center $610,000; (38) P240 Department of Natural Resources (a) Pawmetto Lifeline - Spaying and Neutering Programs  $610,000; (b) Town of Port Royal - Shrimp Dock Redevelopment $610,000; (c) Florence County - Land Conservation $1,220,000; (d) Marlboro County - Animal Shelter $90,000; (e) City of North Charleston - Charleston Animal Society  $750,000; (39) P280 Department of Parks, Recreation and Tourism (a) Williamsburg County - Muddy Creek Community Center and Park $100,000; (b) Williamsburg County - Chavis One Stop Complex Splash Pad $350,000; (c) City of North Myrtle Beach - Boardwalk   $1,220,000; (d) City of Greenville - Visit Greenville  $366,000; (e) City of Columbia - Sims Park Revitalization $100,000; (f) City of Columbia - Hampton Park Walking Path Restoration $305,000; (g) Town of Six Mile - Ponderosa Park Safety Lighting $300,000; (h) Town of Six Mile - Bryson Children's Park   $75,000; (i) City of Travelers Rest - Community Recreation Center and Pool $1,830,000; (j) Lexington County - Ballpark Road Baseball Complex  $818,963; (k) Town of Springdale - Community Center  $842,000; (l) South Carolina National Heritage Corridor - SC 7  $300,000; (m) South Carolina Appalachian Council of Governments $878,750; (n) Pickens County - YMCA Brotherton Family Child Development and Training Center  $305,000; (o) Greenville Zoo and Riverbanks Zoo  $2,013,000; (p) City of Seneca - Recreation Complex $488,000; (q) City of Beaufort - Henry C. Chambers Waterfront Park $3,050,000; (r) Towns of Batesburg-Leesville - Haynes Auditorium Renovation $697,209; (s) Town of Cameron - Pickleball Court Fencing $20,000; (t) Horry County - Loris Recreation Center $1,000,000; (u) City of Dillon - Recreation Improvements $100,000; (v) Brookgreen Gardens - Purdy Center  $1,220,000; (w) Pickens County - Dacusville Community Center Repairs $360,000; (x) York School District - Jefferson Field $150,000; (y) Town of Lane - Digital Lane Youth Center Repairs  $158,000; (z) Florence County - Tennis Court Refurbishment $200,000; (aa) Town of Kingstree - Recreation Center and Canteen Building Upgrades   $305,000; (bb) Charleston County - Gullah Geechee Cultural Community Center $500,000; (cc) Fairfield County - Ridgeway Playground $34,460; (dd) Horry County - Carolina Forest Recreation Center $1,220,000; (ee) Lancaster County - Flat Creek Park Walking Track $391,000; (ff) Santee-Lynches COG - Historic Camden  $260,000; (gg) Spartanburg County - Daniel Morgan Trail System $305,000; (hh) City of Goose Creek - Creekside Park Improvements $200,000; (ii) City of North Charleston - Northwoods Park $305,000; (jj) Spartanburg County - Youth Athletic Association $915,000; (kk) York County - Worth Mountain Park   $457,500; (ll) Town of Cowpens - East Spartanburg Sports Center $1,830,000; (mm) Town of Van Wyck - Park and Green Space $300,000; (nn) City of Lancaster - Lindsay Pettus Greenway  $1,138,510; (oo) City of Hardeeville - Beaufort-Jasper YMCA of the Lowcountry  $200,000; (pp) Town of Bluffton - Pathway and Recreation Facilities $100,000; (qq) Aiken County Public Schools - Midland Valley Recreation Association   $70,000; (rr) Sumter County - Pack's Landing Recreation Park $2,582,950; (ss) York County - Catawba Bend Greenway  $305,000; (tt) Kershaw County - Knights Hill Park Walking Trail  $185,000; (uu) Kershaw County - Cassatt Park Walking Trail $120,000; (vv) City of Columbia - Emily Douglas Park Renovations $250,000; (ww) City of Columbia - Bridge to the Greenway   $1,830,000; (xx) City of Sumter - YMCA $1,220,000; (yy) City of Hanahan - Splash Pad   $578,750; (zz) South Carolina Aquarium - Critical Building Infrastructure $810,500; (aaa) City of Mauldin - Multipurpose Stadium $6,000,000; (bbb) City of Darlington - Public Swimming Pool  $250,000: (ccc) City of Rock Hill - Lige Street Park $100,000; (ddd) City of Rock Hill - Southland Park $100,000; (40) P320 Department of Commerce (a) Myrtle Beach Cable Landing Site Prep  $1,491,418; (b) SCTAC - Defense Aircraft Paint Hangar  $1,115,001; (c) Town of Tatum - Commercial Site Project $90,000; (d) Lancaster County - Heath Springs Business Park Industrial Site Readiness $100,000; (41) P360 Patriots Point Development Authority National Medal of Honor Leadership & Education Center $4,833,940; (42) P450 Rural Infrastructure Authority (a) City of Cayce - Floodwater Removal Improvements $2,440,000; (b) Lake Marion Regional Water Agency - Transmission Lines $1,830,000; (c) Town of Saint George - Water Tank Project  $610,000; (d) Easley Combined Utilities - Middle Branch Expansion $875,000; (e) City of Goose Creek - Stormwater Piping on SR-728 $427,000; (f) James Island Public Service District-Wastewater Pump Station Rehabilitation   $457,500; (g) Pickens County - Regional Joint Water System $1,220,000; (h) City of Lake City - Acline Avenue Drainage $335,500; (i) City of Florence - Water and Sewer Infrastructure $3,782,000; (j) Town of Kershaw - Little Lynches River Water Project $900,000; (k) Beaufort-Jasper Water and Sewer Authority - Alljoy Sewer $2,440,000; (l) City of York - Wastewater Lift Station Upgrades  $915,000; (m) City of Sumter - Lift Station Improvement   $2,500,000; (n) City of Sumter - Water & Sewer Rehabilitation $4,200,000; (o) City of Charleston - Orleans Road Drainage Improvements $1,000,000; (p) Greenville Water - Protective Drone System $1,000,000; (43) P500 Department of Environmental Services (a) Horry County Soil and Water Conservation District - Fire Resilient $15,000; (b) USC Beaufort - Port Royal Sound Foundation  $100,000; (44) E200 Attorney General's Office Attorney General - SC Child ID Program $160,160; (45) E210 Prosecution Coordination Commission (a) 4th Circuit Solicitor's Office - Security & Training   $250,000; (b) State Prosecution College $2,000,000; (46) D100 State Law Enforcement Division SASS Go - The Banks  $1,000,000; (47) K050 Department of Public Safety (a) Bamberg County Sheriff's Office - Camera System  $500,000; (b) Serve & Connect - Police & Community Support $1,000,000; (c) City of Anderson Police Department - Armored SWAT Vehicle $332,800; (d) Anderson County - Safe Streets for All  $140,000; (e) City of Easley - Police Department $500,000; (f) Abbeville County Coroner's Office - Vehicle Replacement   $58,531; (g) McCormick County Sheriff's Department - Equipment $447,700; (h) Town of Cameron - License Plate Reading Camera  $35,000; (i) Town of North - Law Enforcement Equipment  $150,000; (j) Hampton County Sheriff's Office - Equipment   $718,000; (k) Dillon County - EMS   $200,000: (l) Dillon County - Emergency Center $625,000; (m) City of Dillon - Public Safety Police Vehicle $280,000; (n) City of Dillon  - Public Works Vehicle  $417,850; (o) Town of Latta - Handheld Radios   $29,215; (p) Town of Latta - Car Radios $27,079; (q) Dillon County Sheriff's Office - Equipment   $100,000; (r) Spartanburg Police Department-Omegas of Spartanburg, Inc Building Renovation $500,200; (s) Beaufort County Sheriff's Office - Forensics Services Lab $500,000; (t) Town of Bluffton Police Department - AED Replacement $100,000; (u) Town of Harleyville Police Department - Officer Safety Project 2026 $75,000; (v) Town of Ridgeville - Police Equipment $80,000; (w) Pine Ridge Police Department - Laptops  $3,508; (x) Chester County Sheriff's Office  $1,000,000; (y) Marlboro County Sheriff's Office - Equipment Upgrades $500,000; (z) Lancaster County Coroner's Office - Mounted Response Unit  $50,000; (aa) Lancaster County Sheriff's Office - Maintenance and Enhancements $750,000; (bb) Kershaw County Sheriff's Office - Kershaw County Law Enforcement Memorial $150,000; (cc) City of Lancaster - Police Fleet Vehicle Replacements   $650,000; (dd) City of Manning Police Department $410,000; (ee) Clarendon County - Sheriff's Office $1,000,000; (ff) Town of Clover - Police Department Headquarters  $1,000,000; (gg) Laurens County Sheriff's Office - Training Facility $500,000; (hh) Sumter County Sheriff's Department $974,000; (ii) City of Sumter - Police Department Equipment Funding  $1,700,000; (jj) City of Greer - Public Safety Training Center $2,000,000; (kk) Lexington County Sheriff's Department - Body Cameras $400,000; (ll) Saluda County - Public Safety $800,000; (mm) Florence County Sheriff's Office - Equipment  $100,000; (48) N120 Department of Juvenile Justice Town of Eastover - JUMPS  $150,000; (49) R360 Department of Labor, Licensing and Regulation (a) Britton's Neck/Gresham Volunteer Fire Department - Equipment $46,600; (b) Irmo Fire District - Regional Training Facility $800,000; (c) Town of Central - New Fire Department $1,000,000; (d) Double Springs Fire Department - Tanker Fire Truck   $700,000; (e) Townville Fire Department - Quick Attack Fire Truck  $150,850; (f) Zion Volunteer Fire Department - Mini-Pumper Response Truck $165,500; (g) City of Easley - Fire Department Equipment $515,000; (h) City of Goose Creek - Fire Department Turnout Gear  $254,728; (i) Town of Moncks Corner - Fire Station Construction $4,000,000; (j) Monterey Volunteer Fire Department - Equipment and Upgrades $239,100; (k) Antreville Volunteer Fire Department - Upgrades $205,000; (l) Grove Fire Department - Rescue and Brush Truck $75,000; (m) Town of Cameron - Fire Department $96,000; (n) Horry County - Fire Station $2,000,000; (o) Newport Volunteer Fire Department - Fire Boat $650,000; (p) Berea Public Service District - Fire District Headquarters $3,000,000; (q) Town of Hampton - Fire Cascade Fill Equipment $180,000; (r) Dillon County - First Aid and Rescue Crew   $200,000; (s) Dillon County - Fire Services  $200,000; (t) Town of Lake View - Rescue Squad   $12,197; (u) Murrells Inlet - Garden City Fire District Operations Center $1,250,000; (v) City of Georgetown - Fire Safety Equipment $250,000; (w) Pine Ridge Fire Department - Station Upgrades   $62,000; (x) Berkeley County Fire Department - Fire Station Emergency Backup Generators $55,000; (y) West Chester Fire Department-Wilksburg Station $250,000; (z) Boiling Springs Fire District - Heavy Rescue Equipment $450,000; (aa) Fairfield County - Fire Service Extrication Tools $465,900; (bb) Alligator Fire Dept - Air Pack Replacements   $111,000; (cc) City of Hartsville - Fire Department Radios $250,000; (dd) Cherokee Springs Fire District - Equipment $350,000; (ee) Spartanburg County - Trinity Fire Department $650,000; (ff) Cherokee County - Corinth Volunteer Fire Department   $180,000; (gg) City of Gaffney Fire Department - Fire Training Center $395,000; (hh) Town of Sharon - Volunteer Fire Department  $400,000; (ii) Cherokee County - DMV Volunteer Fire Department  $750,000; (jj) City of York - Fire Ladder Truck   $3,000,000; (kk) Colleton County - Firefighters Breathing Apparatus   $500,000; (ll) Dorchester County - Jedburg Fire and EMS Station $500,000; (mm) Town of Williamston - Fire Department Equipment $115,000; (nn) Anderson County - West Pelzer Fire Department Equipment $65,000; (oo) City of Anderson - Fire Department Equipment  $42,817; (pp) Clear Springs - Fire and Rescue Infrastructure $2,481,600; (50) R600 Department of Employment and Workforce SC Bio                  $305,000; (51) U120 Department of Transportation (a) SCDOT - Railroad Crossing Safety Pilot    $1,250,000; (b) Charleston County - Hwy 61 Corridor Improvements   $1,220,000; (c) Lexington County - Calks Ferry Interchange $610,000; (d) Edgefield County - Carey Hill Road Widening and Paving Project  $549,000; (e) Horry County - HWY 544 Socastee Bridge Resurfacing  $6,100,000; (f) Berkeley County - Bushy Park Road  $3,000,000; (g) City of Charleston - Nabors Drive Sidewalk  $268,000; (h) US 378 Juniper Bay Intersection $2,257,000; (i) City of Columbia - Devine Street Corridor $762,500; (j) Sumter County - Patriot Park Emergency Access Road and Parking $2,000,000; (k) Charleston County-Main Road Sidewalk Chisolm Road to Maybank Highway $1,200,000; (l) City of Charleston - West Ashley Greenway Safety  $100,000; (m) City of Charleston - Secessionville Road Safety Improvements  $765,000; (n) City of Folly Beach - West Ashley Avenue Pedestrian Safety Improvements $439,750; (o) City of Mauldin - Sidewalk Safety Improvements    $500,000 (52) U300 Division of Aeronautics (a) McCormick County - Airport Capital Improvements $305,000; (b) Sumter County Airport - Terminal $1,525,000; (c) Florence County - PDRTA Stranded Passenger Transport Program $25,000; (53) D300 Office of Resilience (a) Dorchester County - Eagle Creek Flood Control Project   $457,500; (b) Georgetown County - MLK Drive Drainage $1,135,000; (c) City of Conway - Chestnut Bay Resilience Project - Flood Relief   $1,000,000; (d) City of Summerville Critical Public Safety Events $4,000,000; (54) E240 Adjutant General's Office (a) Pickens County - Fort Prince George Reconstruction $610,000; (b) Town of Mount Croghan - Emergency Shelter  $131,000; (55) E260 Department of Veterans' Affairs (a) Anderson County - Veterans Support Program  $163,000; (b) Dorchester County - Veteran's Service Center Parking Improvements $100,000; (c) Town of Ridgeland - Operation Patriots FOB - Retreat and Wellness Program   $610,000; (56) X220 Aid to Subdivisions - State Treasurer (a) Chester County Emergency Management Division-Gateway Conference Center Generator   $280,000; (b) Town of Bluffton - Rotary Community Center Renovation  $250,000; (c) City of Bishopville - Downtown Redevelopment  $425,000; (d) City of Myrtle Beach - Downtown Public Infrastructure  $5,032,500; (e) Abbeville County Magistrate's Court - Equipment Upgrades $22,000; (f) Abbeville County - Courthouse Restoration   $610,000; (g) Town of North - Improvements  $50,000; (h) City of Loris  - Downtown Redevelopment $560,000; (i) Town of Lake View - Street and Maintenance Department $20,000; (j) Town of Lake View - Excavator and Trailer  $171,509; (k) Town of Bluffton-Historic Bluffton Foundation Colcock Teel House Building Renovation $300,000; (l) Town of McClellanville - McClellanville Middle School Projects - Phase 2 $1,000,000; (m) City of Liberty - Liberty Municipal Complex   $1,220,000; (n) Town of Harleyville - Emergency Shelter  $80,000; (o) Allendale County - Community Center  $457,500; (p) Town of Blackville - Revitalization $305,000; (q) Town of Fairfax - Revitalization $300,000; (r) Town of Williston - Sidewalk Development  $100,000; (s) Town of Norway - Revitalization $250,000; (t) City of Inman - Police Department and Fire Station Improvements $4,000,000; (u) Town of Pamplico - Improvements $170,000; (v) Town of Fort Mill - Academic Hub $1,000,000; (w) Town of Jenkinsville - Outdoor Restrooms and Handicapped Ramps $30,000; (x) Town of Winnsboro - Downtown Revitalization   $300,000; (y) Town of Winnsboro - Town Hall Upgrade $200,000; (z) City of Camden - Downtown Revitalization  $1,518,000; (aa) Town of Ravenel - Town Hall  $457,500; (bb) City of Mauldin - Town Hall Improvements $500,000; (cc) City of Simpsonville - Infrastructure Improvements $915,000; (dd) City of Sumter - South Sumter Community Improvements $1,700,000; (ee) City of Sumter - Lincoln Museum $700,000; (ff) Fountain Inn - Municipal Complex $500,000; and (gg) Lexington County - Mission Lexington Community Service Facility $1,830,000. (C) Unexpended funds appropriated pursuant to this act may be carried forward to succeeding fiscal years and expended for the same purposes. (D) For the purpose of all items subsection (B), funds shall not be disbursed until verification that receiver's organization is registered as a business, nonprofit, or charitable organization with the South Carolina Secretary of State's office. This requirement does not apply to governmental entities or entities created by statute. Upon receipt and verification of all requirements in this act, the funds shall be transferred directly to the grant recipients within ten business days. (E) For the purpose of this act, the Executive Budget Office may authorize the transfer of items among state agencies upon request of the agencies after consultation with the Senate Finance Committee and House Ways and Means Committee. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----